Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Part 4 Asian Longhorned Beetle & Emerald Ash Borer

2-17-21.
Nuisance.

The Asian longhorned beetle, Anoplophora glabripennis, a native insect pest of China, is known to be a serious insect pest to several tree species within the United States, including, but not limited to, maples, willows, poplars, birch, London Plane,
and elms. The emerald ash borer, Agrilus planipennis, also a native insect pest from Asia, is also known to be a serious insect pest to several types of ash trees within the United States, including, but not limited to, green ash,
white ash, and black ash. All of the at-risk trees are part of the natural environment of Rhode Island and occur on many of the state’s public and private lands, contributing to their value and health. Additionally these insects pose
substantive risk to the Rhode Island nursery and landscape industry plant materials and market opportunities. Accordingly, the Asian longhorned beetle and emerald ash borer are hereby declared to be public nuisances, and their suppression
is authorized and required. No owner or occupant of an estate infested with either or both nuisances is by reason of that infestation liable to an action, civil or criminal, except to the extent and in the manner and form set forth
in §§

2-17-22

—

2-17-24

.

History of Section.
P.L. 2009, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 161, § 1.

2-17-22.
Unlawful importation or transportation.

Any person importing into this state, or transporting from place to place within this state, contrary to quarantine and transport rules or regulations of the United States department of agriculture/animal, and plant, health inspection service (APHIS)
or the director of the department of environmental management governing the Asian longhorned beetle or emerald ash borer, any regulated articles, as defined below in §

2-17-23

, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each offense, assessed in accordance with chapter 42-17.6 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

History of Section.
P.L. 2009, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 161, § 1.

2-17-23.
Regulated articles.

Regulated articles shall mean any of the following raw wood materials taken or harvested from a quarantined area: any living, dead, standing, cut or fallen tree, inclusive of nursery stock, or any piece or portion thereof measuring a half inch or more
in diameter, including any branches, logs, stumps, roots, or chips, firewood, or green lumber. Kiln-dried lumber and manufactured or finished wooden products are not considered regulated articles pursuant to §

2-17-22

.

Regulated articles shall also include any other article, regardless of its place of origin, found to be infested by the Asian longhorned beetle or emerald ash borer if an authorized state or federal inspector notifies the person in possession of the article
that it is infested and therefore subject to the quarantine and transport rules or regulations of APHIS or the director of the department of environmental management.

Regulated articles shall also include any other article designated as a regulated article pursuant to any duly promulgated amendments to the quarantine and transport rules or regulations of APHIS or the director of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.
P.L. 2009, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 161, § 1.

2-17-24.
Prosecution of violations.

All state prosecutions under the provisions of §§

2-17-21

—

2-17-23

shall be instituted by the director of the department of environmental management, and shall be directed by him or her, and all penalties recovered for the violation of any of the provisions of §§

2-17-21

—

2-17-23

shall be paid into the treasury of the state.

History of Section.
P.L. 2009, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 161, § 1.